District of Columbia statutes.
29-506

Incorporation.

One or more individuals may incorporate a professional corporation by delivering articles of incorporation for filing to the Mayor. The articles of incorporation shall meet the requirements of Chapter 3 of this title and shall set forth:

(1)

The designation of the professional services to be rendered through the corporation;

(2)

The names and addresses, including street address, if any, of the original shareholders of the corporation; and

(3)

A statement that each of the original shareholders and directors named in the articles of incorporation is licensed to render a professional service for which the corporation is to be organized.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
This section is referenced in § 29-503.
2001 Ed., § 29-406.
1981 Ed., § 29-606.
1973 Ed., § 29-1106.